California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(F) If the individual requires supportive housing, referral to the local homeless continuum of care for long-term services promoting housing stability.

(G) Referrals and coordination of services to access mental or behavioral health assistance, as necessary or appropriate.

(d) The department shall provide grants to counties and tribes according to criteria and procedures developed by the department, in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association of California, tribes, the California Elder Justice Coalition, and the California Commission on Aging. These criteria shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Eligible sources of funds and in-kind contributions to match the grant, as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (e).

(2) The proportion of funding to be expended on reasonable and appropriate administrative activities, in order to minimize overhead and maximize services.

(3) Tracking and reporting procedures for the program, which shall be conducted as a condition of receiving funds, including, but not limited to, collecting disaggregated data on all of the following:

(A) The number of people determined eligible for the program.

(B) The number of people receiving assistance from the program and the duration of that assistance.

(C) The types of housing assistance
 received by recipients.

(D) The housing status six months and one year after receiving assistance from the program.

(E) The number of substantiated adult protective services reports six months and one year after receiving assistance from the program.

(e) Grants shall be subject to all of the following requirements:

(1) (A) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (B), grantees shall match the funding on a dollar-for-dollar basis, which may be met by cash or in-kind contributions.

(B) Beginning
 on July 1, 2021, grantees that receive state funds under this chapter shall not be required to match any funding.

(2) Grantees shall demonstrate the extent to which they will attempt to leverage county mental health services funds for participating individuals, and any barriers to leveraging these funds.

(3) Grantees shall agree to actively cooperate with tracking, reporting, and evaluation efforts.

(4) Grantees shall coordinate with the local homeless continuum of care network.

(f) Funding pursuant to
 this section shall supplement, and not supplant, the level of county or tribal funding spent on these purposes in the 2017–18 fiscal year.

(g) Utilizing the funds appropriated for purposes of this chapter, the department shall, in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association of California, tribes, the California Elder Justice Coalition, and the California Commission on Aging, enter into a contract with an independent evaluation and research agency to evaluate the impacts of the program, which may include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) The likelihood of future homelessness and housing instability among recipients.

(2) The likelihood of future instances of abuse and neglect among recipients.

(3) Program costs and benefits.

(h) This chapter shall not be construed to require a tribe, or tribal entity or agency, to comply with Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 15750) of this part, including, but not limited to, the requirement to establish a county adult protective services system or an emergency response adult protective services program.

(i) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this chapter through all-county letters without taking regulatory action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 79, Sec. 25.   (SB 119)   Effective July 29, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3.3. Health Care Coverage Assistance [15800. - 15895.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [15800. - 15806.]

15800.

(a) (1) Commencing October 1, 2013, the State Department of Health Care Services shall administer the AIM-Linked Infants Program to address the health care needs of children formerly covered pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 12693.70 of the Insurance Code. The department is vested with the same powers, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction exercised by the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board as they relate to those children. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to alter, diminish, or supersede the authority of the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board to exercise the same powers, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction within the Healthy Families Program established under Part 6.2
 (commencing with Section 12693) of Division 2 of the Insurance Code.

(2) (A) Commencing on July 1, 2014, the State Department of Health Care Services shall administer any other programs under, and succeeds to and is vested with the same powers, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction exercised by, the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board.

(B) Commencing on July 1, 2014, any reference in any statute, except for this chapter, Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 15850), and Section 12739.61 of, and Part 6.8 (commencing with Section 12739.77) of Division 2 of, the Insurance Code, and in any regulation, contract, or any other document, to the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board is deemed to instead refer to the State Department of Health Care Services.

(3) The department may, before October 1,
 2013, conduct transition activities necessary to ensure the efficient transfer of the program identified in paragraph (1) and populations served by that program.

(4) The department may, before July 1, 2014, conduct transition activities necessary to ensure the efficient transfer of the programs identified in paragraph (2) and populations served by these programs.

(b) The department shall seek any federal waivers, approvals, and state plan amendments necessary to implement this part. This part shall only be implemented to the extent that necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available for eligible programs and services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 58.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

15801.

(a) The terms of all regulations and orders adopted by the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board in effect preceding July 1, 2014, that relate to the operation of the program and to the children transferred by the act that added this section and are not rendered legally unenforceable by the act that added this section shall be fully enforceable by the State Department of Health Care Services within the AIM-Linked Infants Program and the Medi-Cal Access Program unless and until the department adopts regulations for the Medi-Cal Access Program. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to alter, diminish, or supersede the authority of the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board to interpret, enforce, maintain, or amend the same regulations for purposes of the Healthy Families Program
 established under Part 6.2 (commencing with Section 12693) of Division 2 of the Insurance Code.

(b) All regulations and orders adopted by the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board that relate to the programs transferred pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 15800 in effect on July 1, 2014, and not rendered legally unenforceable by the act adding this subdivision shall remain in effect and shall be fully enforceable unless and until readopted, amended, or repealed by the State Department of Health Care Services, or until they expire by their own terms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 59.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

15802.

(a) The State Department of Health Care Services may issue rules and regulations to carry out the purposes of this part.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) or Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department, without taking any further regulatory actions, may implement, interpret, or make specific this part and amend or repeal regulations and orders adopted by the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board as provided in Section 15801 by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions, without taking regulatory action during the transition of the programs to the department. Thereafter, the
 adoption and readoption of regulations to implement, interpret, or make specific this part shall be deemed to be an emergency that calls for immediate action to avoid serious harm to the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the department is exempted from the requirement that it describe facts showing the need for immediate action. The regulations shall become effective immediately upon filing with the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 23, Sec. 68.   (AB 82)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

15802.5.

Effective on July 1, 2014, all permanent or probationary civil service employees who are employed by the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board shall be transferred to the State Department of Health Care Services or the California Health Benefits Exchange as described in Section 12739.78 of the Insurance Code, and their civil service status, position, and rights, including return rights, shall be determined pursuant to Section 12739.78 of the Insurance Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 60.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

15803.

(a) To implement this part and clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 12693.70 of the Insurance Code, the State Department of Health Care Services may contract with public or private entities. Contracts entered into under this part may be on a noncompetitive bid basis and are exempt from the following:

(1) Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code and any policies, procedures, or regulations authorized by that part.

(2) Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(3) Review or approval of contracts by the Department of General Services.

(b) During the transition of the programs to the department, the department shall also be exempt from the review or approval of feasibility study reports and the requirements of Sections 4819.35 to 4819.37, inclusive, and 4920 to 4928, inclusive, of the State Administrative Manual.

(c) For contracts entered into under this part, the State Department of Health Care Services shall not be required to specify the amounts encumbered for each contract, but may allocate funds to each contract based on the projected or actual subscriber enrollments to a total amount not to exceed the amount appropriated for the program including family contributions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 61.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

15804.

On October 1, 2013, or when the State Department of Health Care Services has implemented Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 15810), whichever occurs later, the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board shall cease to provide coverage to the children transferred to the AIM-Linked Infants Program, pursuant to Section 15800.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 62.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

15805.

(a) (1) The Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board shall provide the State Department of Health Care Services any data, information, or record concerning the Healthy Families Program or the Access for Infants and Mothers Program as are necessary to implement this part and clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 12693.70 of the Insurance Code.

(2) All books, documents, files, property, data, information, or record in possession of the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board, except for personnel records related to staff transferred to the California Health Benefits Exchange pursuant to Section 12739.61 or 12739.78 of
 the Insurance Code, shall be transferred to the State Department of Health Care Services on July 1, 2014.

(3) Until the transition of duties from the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board to the State Department of Health Care Services required under subdivision (a) of Section 15800 is complete, any book, document, file, property, data, information, or record in the possession of the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board pertaining to functions, programs, and subscribers to be transferred to the State Department of Health Care Services pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 15800 shall immediately be made available to the State Department of Health Care Services upon request for review, inspection, and copying, including electronic transmittal, including records otherwise not subject to disclosure under Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of
 Title 1 of the Government Code.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, all of the following shall apply:

(1) The term “book, document, file, property, data, information, or record” shall include, but is not limited to, personal information as defined in Section 1798.3 of the Civil Code.

(2) Any book, document, file, property, data, information, or record shall be exempt from disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) and any other law, to the same extent that it was exempt from disclosure or privileged prior to the provision of the book, document, file, property, data, information, or record to the department.

(3) The provision of any book, document, file, property, data, information, or record to the department shall not constitute a waiver of any evidentiary privilege or exemption from disclosure.

(4) The department shall keep all books, documents, files, property, data, information, or records provided by the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board confidential to the full extent permitted by law, including, but not limited to, the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), and consistent with the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board’s contractual obligations to keep books, documents, files, property, data, information, or records confidential.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 459.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

15806.

(a) A contract, lease, license, bond, or any other agreement to which the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board is a party is not void or voidable by reason of the act that added this section, but shall continue in full force and effect, with the State Department of Health Care Services assuming all of the rights, obligations, liabilities, and duties of the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board and any of its predecessors that relate to the duties, powers, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction vested by the act that added this section in the State Department of Health Care Services. The assumption by the State Department of Health Care Services does not in any way affect the rights of the parties to the contract, lease, license, or agreement.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 64.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.  Medi-Cal Access Program [15810. - 15849.]

15810.

(a) This chapter, formerly known as the AIM-Linked Infants Program, shall be known, and may be cited, as the Medi-Cal Access Program.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2014.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 66) and added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 67.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

15811.

(a) The definitions contained in this section govern the construction of this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise.

(b) “Access-linked infant” means any infant born to a woman enrolled in either the program under this chapter or the Access for Infants and Mothers Program under Part 6.3 (commencing with Section 12695) of Division 2 of the Insurance Code.

(c) “Applicant” means an individual who applies for coverage through the program.

(d) “Department” means the State Department of Health Care Services.

(e) “Fund” means the Perinatal Insurance Fund.

(f) “Health education services relating to tobacco use” means tobacco use prevention and education services, including, when appropriate, tobacco use cessation services, in accordance with protocols established by the department in coordination with the California Tobacco Control Program of the State Department of Public Health.

(g) “Participating health plan” means a health plan with which the department contracts to provide health care services to individuals eligible pursuant to Section 15832.

(h) “Program” means the Medi-Cal Access Program.

(i) “Subscriber” means an individual who is eligible for and enrolled in the program.

(j) “Subscriber contribution” means the cost to the subscriber to participate in the program.

(k) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2014.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 68) and added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 69.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

15814.

(a) The department, in coordination with the California Tobacco Control Program of the State Department of Public Health, shall develop protocols relating to health education for tobacco use to the extent necessary to comply with paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 30122 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. These protocols shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Referral to perinatal and related support services.

(2) Outreach services and assessment of smoking status.

(3) Individualized counseling and advocacy services.

(4) Motivational messages.

(5) Cessation services, if appropriate.

(6) Incentives to maintain a healthy lifestyle.

(7) Followup assessment.

(8) Maintenance and relapse prevention services.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 70.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

15818.

(a) Each participating health plan contracting with the department pursuant to this chapter shall provide health education services related to tobacco use to all program participants to the extent necessary to comply with paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 30122 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(b) The education activities required by subdivision (a) shall include all of the following:

(1) Dissuading persons from beginning to smoke.

(2) Encouraging smoking cessation.

(3) Providing information on the
 health effects of tobacco use on the user, children, and nonsmokers.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 71.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

15822.

Health care services under the program shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Preventive, screening, diagnostic, and treatment services furnished directly by a licensed clinic, either onsite or by formal written contract, on a case-managed basis, to patients who remain less than 24 hours at the clinic for an illness or injury, advice, counseling, outreach, and translation as needed.

(b) Physician services.

(c) Emergency first aid, perinatal, obstetric, radiology, laboratory, and nutrition services.

(d) Services of advanced practice nurses or mid-level practitioners who are authorized to perform any of the services listed in this section within the scope of their licensure.

(e) All services and benefits set forth in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 23, Sec. 68.   (AB 82)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

15824.

To the extent permitted by federal law, services for individuals eligible under this chapter shall be provided, at the department’s discretion and to the extent the department determines the selected delivery system is cost effective, through the Medi-Cal fee-for-service or managed care delivery system, or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 23, Sec. 68.   (AB 82)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

15826.

(a) The department shall administer the program and may do all of the following:

(1) Determine eligibility criteria for the program. These criteria shall include the requirements set forth in Section 15832.

(2) Determine the eligibility of applicants.

(3) Determine when subscribers are covered and the extent and scope of coverage.

(4) Determine subscriber contribution amounts schedules, subject to the following:

(A) Subscriber contributions for Access-linked infants shall not be greater than those applicable on
 March 23, 2010, for infants enrolled pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 12693.70 of the Insurance Code.

(B) Subscriber contributions for mothers shall conform with the maintenance of effort requirements under the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), or any amendment or extension of that act.

(C) (i) Effective July 1, 2022, to the extent allowable under federal law, and notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter to the contrary, the department may elect not to impose subscriber contributions for purposes of this program as described in Section 15849 for an applicable coverage period,

(ii) If the department elects to not impose subscriber contributions for an applicable coverage period pursuant to
 clause (i) or elects to reinstate such subscriber contributions for a subsequent coverage period, the department shall specify that election in the published Medi-Cal Local Assistance Estimate for the impacted state fiscal year or years, subject to appropriation by the annual Budget Act.

(5) Provide coverage through Medi-Cal delivery systems and contract for the administration of the program and the enrollment of subscribers. Any contract entered into pursuant to this chapter shall be exempt from any provision of law relating to competitive bidding, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. The department shall not be required to specify the amounts encumbered for each contract, but may allocate funds to each contract based on projected and actual subscriber enrollments in a total amount not to exceed the amount appropriated for the program.

(6) Authorize expenditures to pay program expenses that exceed subscriber contributions, and to administer the program as necessary.

(7) Develop a promotional component of the program to make Californians aware of the program and the opportunity that it presents.

(8) (A) Issue rules and regulations as necessary to administer the program.

(B) During the 2011–12 to 2014–15 fiscal years, inclusive, the adoption and readoption of regulations pursuant to this chapter shall be deemed to be an emergency that calls for immediate action to avoid serious harm to the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the department is hereby exempted from the requirement that
 the department describe facts showing the need for immediate action and from review by the Office of Administrative Law.

(9) Exercise all powers reasonably necessary to carry out the powers and responsibilities expressly granted or imposed by this chapter.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2014.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 135.   (SB 184)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

15827.

(a) The department shall administer the program in a manner that ensures that program expenditures do not exceed amounts available in the fund.

(b) This section shall be implemented only if and to the extent that it does not jeopardize the state’s ability to receive federal financial participation under the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), or any amendment or extension of that act.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 74.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

15828.

The department shall coordinate with other state agencies, as appropriate, to help ensure continuity of health care services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 23, Sec. 68.   (AB 82)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

15830.

(a) The department may contract with a variety of health plans and types of health care service delivery systems in order to offer subscribers a choice of plans, providers, and types of service delivery.

(b) Participating health plans contracting with the department pursuant to this chapter shall provide benefits or coverage to subscribers only as determined by the department pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 15826.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 23, Sec. 68.   (AB 82)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

15832.

(a) To be eligible to participate in the program, a person shall meet all of the requirements in either paragraph (1) or (2):

(1) (A) Be pregnant or in the postpartum period as specified in Section 15840 and a resident of the state. A person who is a member of a federally recognized California Indian tribe is a resident of the state for these purposes.

(B) Have a household income that is above 208 percent of the official federal poverty level but does not exceed 317 percent of the official federal poverty level.

(C) Agree to the payment of the complete subscriber contribution. A federally recognized California Indian
 tribal government may make the subscriber contributions on behalf of a member of the tribe only if a contribution on behalf of members of federally recognized California Indian tribes does not limit or preclude federal financial participation under Title XXI of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1397aa et seq.). If a federally recognized California Indian tribal government makes a contribution on behalf of a member of the tribe, the tribal government shall ensure that the subscriber is made aware of all the health care delivery options available in the county where the member resides.

(2) (A) Be a child under two years of age who is delivered by a mother enrolled in the program under this chapter. Except as stated in this section, these infants shall be automatically enrolled in the program.

(B) For the applicable month, not be enrolled in
 employer-sponsored health care coverage, or have been enrolled in that health care coverage in the prior three months or enrolled in full-scope Medi-Cal without a share of cost. Exceptions may be identified in regulations or other guidance and shall, at minimum, include all exceptions applicable to the Healthy Families Program on and after March 23, 2010.

(C) Be subject to subscriber contributions as determined by the department.

(3) For infants identified in paragraph (2), all of the following shall apply:

(A) Enrollment in the program shall cover the first 12 months of the infant’s life unless the infant is determined eligible for Medi-Cal benefits under Section 14005.26. An infant shall be screened for eligibility under Section 14005.26 immediately after the infant is born. If the infant is eligible under Section
 14005.26, the infant shall be automatically enrolled in the Medi-Cal program on that basis.

(B) (i) At the end of the 12 months, as a condition of continued eligibility, the subscriber shall provide income information. The infant shall be disenrolled from the program if the annual household income exceeds 317 percent of the federal poverty level, or if the infant is eligible for full-scope Medi-Cal with no share of cost.

(ii) Effective January 1, 2014, when determining eligibility for benefits under the program, income shall be determined, counted, and valued in accordance with the requirements of Section 1397bb(b)(1)(B) of Title 42 of the United States Code as added by the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148) and as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152) and any
 subsequent amendments.

(C) At the end of their first and second year in the program, infants shall be screened for eligibility for the Medi-Cal program.

(4) If at any time the director determines that the eligibility criteria established under this chapter for the program may jeopardize the state’s ability to receive federal financial participation under the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), any amendment or extension of that act, or any similar federal legislation affecting federal financial participation, the director may alter the eligibility criteria to the extent necessary for the state to receive that federal financial participation.

(5) (A) Effective July 1, 2024, or the effective date for implementation of the Children’s Presumptive Eligibility
 Program portal pursuant to Section 14011.7, whichever is later, all qualified Medi-Cal providers participating in presumptive eligibility programs shall use the electronic Newborn Hospital Gateway process, as described in Section 14148.04, to report the birth of an infant eligible under this chapter who is born in their facilities, including hospitals, birthing centers, or other birthing settings, within 72 hours after the birth, or one business day after discharge, whichever is sooner.

(B) The inclusion of infants eligible under this chapter in the Newborn Hospital Gateway process shall commence on July 1, 2024, or on the effective date for implementation of the Children’s Presumptive Eligibility Program portal pursuant to Section 14011.7, whichever is later.

(b) (1) If the voters approve the addition of Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 14199.100) to
 Part 3 of this division at the November 5, 2024, statewide general election and the conditions described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 15832, as added by Section 137 of the act that added this subdivision, have been met, this section shall become inoperative on January 1, 2025, or the date certified by the department pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 15832, as added by Section 137 of the act that added this subdivision, whichever is later, and shall be repealed on January 1 directly following that date.

(2) If the voters do not approve the addition of Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 14199.100) to Part 3 of this division at the November 5, 2024, statewide general election and the conditions described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 15832, as added by Section 137 of the act that added this subdivision, have been met, this section shall become inoperative on January 1, 2026, or the date
 certified by the department pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 15832, as added by Section 137 of the act that added this subdivision, whichever is later, and shall be repealed on January 1 directly following that date.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 162) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 40, Sec. 74.   (SB 159)   Effective June 29, 2024.   Conditionally inoperative on or after January 1, 2025 as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed on January 1 following the inoperative date.   See later operative version amended by Sec. 75 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 40.)
-------------------------------------------

15832.

(a) To be eligible to participate in the program, a person shall meet all of the requirements in either paragraph (1) or (2):

(1) (A) Be pregnant or in the postpartum period as specified in Section 15840 and a resident of the state. A person who is a member of a federally recognized California Indian tribe is a resident of the state for these purposes.

(B) Have a household income that is above 208 percent of the official federal poverty level but does not exceed 317 percent of the official federal poverty level.

(C) Agree to the payment of the complete subscriber contribution. A federally recognized California Indian
 tribal government may make the subscriber contributions on behalf of a member of the tribe only if a contribution on behalf of members of federally recognized California Indian tribes does not limit or preclude federal financial participation under Title XXI of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1397aa et seq.). If a federally recognized California Indian tribal government makes a contribution on behalf of a member of the tribe, the tribal government shall ensure that the subscriber is made aware of all the health care delivery options available in the county where the member resides.

(2) (A) Be a child under two years of age who is delivered by a mother enrolled in the program under this chapter. Except as stated in this section, these infants shall be automatically enrolled in the program.

(B) For the applicable month, not be enrolled in
 employer-sponsored health care coverage, or have been enrolled in that health care coverage in the prior three months or enrolled in full-scope Medi-Cal without a share of cost. Exceptions may be identified in regulations or other guidance and shall, at minimum, include all exceptions applicable to the Healthy Families Program on and after March 23, 2010.

(C) Be subject to subscriber contributions as determined by the department.

(3) For infants identified in paragraph (2), all of the following shall apply:

(A) Enrollment in the program shall cover the first 12 months of the infant’s life unless the infant is determined eligible for Medi-Cal benefits under Section 14005.26. An infant shall be screened for eligibility under Section 14005.26 immediately after the infant is born. If the infant is eligible under Section
 14005.26, the infant shall be automatically enrolled in the Medi-Cal program on that basis.

(B) (i) At the end of the 12 months, the infant shall remain continuously eligible for the Medi-Cal program until they are five years of age. A redetermination of Medi-Cal eligibility shall not be conducted before the child reaches five years of age, except as specified in Section 14005.255. This clause shall be implemented to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available. The department shall seek any necessary federal approvals to implement this clause.

(ii) Effective January 1, 2014, when determining eligibility for benefits under the program, income shall be determined, counted, and valued in accordance with the requirements of Section 1397bb(b)(1)(B) of Title 42 of the United States Code as added by
 the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148) and as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152) and any subsequent amendments.

(C) At the end of their first and second year in the program, and subsequent years, up to five years of age, the child shall be screened for eligibility for the Medi-Cal program.

(4) If at any time the director determines that the eligibility criteria established under this chapter for the program may jeopardize the state’s ability to receive federal financial participation under the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), any amendment or extension of that act, or any similar federal legislation affecting federal financial participation, the director may alter the eligibility criteria to the extent necessary for the state to receive that
 federal financial participation.

(5) (A) Effective July 1, 2024, or the effective date for implementation of the Children’s Presumptive Eligibility Program portal pursuant to Section 14011.7, whichever is later, all qualified Medi-Cal providers participating in presumptive eligibility programs shall use the electronic Newborn Hospital Gateway process, as described in Section 14148.04, to report the birth of an infant eligible under this chapter who is born in their facilities, including hospitals, birthing centers, or other birthing settings, within 72 hours after the birth, or one business day after discharge, whichever is sooner.

(B) The inclusion of infants eligible under this chapter in the Newborn Hospital Gateway process shall commence on July 1, 2024, or on the effective date for implementation of the Children’s Presumptive Eligibility Program portal
 pursuant to Section 14011.7, whichever is later.

(b) (1) Implementation of this section is contingent on all of the following conditions:

(A) All necessary federal approvals have been obtained by the department pursuant to subdivision (d).

(B) The Legislature has appropriated funding to implement this section after a determination that ongoing General Fund resources are available to support the ongoing implementation of this section in the 2024–25 fiscal year and subsequent fiscal years.

(C) The department has determined that systems have been programmed to implement this section.

(2) The department shall issue a declaration certifying the date that all conditions in
 paragraph (1) have been met. The department shall post the declaration on its internet website and provide a copy of the declaration to the Secretary of State, the Secretary of the Senate, the Chief Clerk of the Assembly, and the Legislative Counsel.

(c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, through all-county letters or similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(d) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained, and federal financial participation is available and not otherwise jeopardized.

(e) (1) If the voters approve the addition of Chapter
 7.5 (commencing with Section 14199.100) to Part 3 of this division at the November 5, 2024, statewide general election, this section shall become operative on January 1, 2025, or the date certified by the department pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), whichever is later.

(2) If the voters do not approve the addition of Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 14199.100) to Part 3 of this division at the November 5, 2024, statewide general election, this section shall be repealed as of January 1, 2025.
